California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 shall submit to the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service a request to waive Section 273.1(b)(7)(vi) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to allow for preenrollment of applicants prior to their release from the state prison or a county jail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   (AB 3073)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.36.

(a) (1) The department, by February 1, 2028, shall establish a CalFresh workgroup to create recommendations for a state reentry process incorporating the necessary resources for transition from state prison or county jail to obtaining CalFresh benefits upon reentry into the community. The composition of the workgroup shall consist of all of the following:

(A) Two representatives from the State Department of Social Services, including one from the Disability Determination Services Division.

(B) One representative from community-based organizations.

(C) One representative from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(D) One representative from the California Health and Human Services Agency.

(E) One representative from the County Welfare Directors Association of California.

(F) Two impacted individuals who were recipients of CalFresh benefits prior to release.

(G) A sheriff or an individual appointed by a sheriff.

(H) One representative from a county human services agency with expertise in CalFresh.

(2) The workgroup shall
 consider how best to increase CalFresh enrollment for otherwise eligible applicants for the CalFresh program to ensure that an applicant’s benefits begin upon the reentry of the applicant into the community from the state prison or county jail.

(3) The workgroup shall consider federal programs or applicable federal waivers to reduce food insecurity for individuals leaving incarceration and to aid in the reentry process.

(4) The workgroup shall meet no less than quarterly.

(b) By August 31, 2029, and annually by August 31 thereafter, through
 2032, the workgroup shall create and submit a report to the department and the Legislature outlining the workgroup’s recommendations. That report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) By January 1, 2026, the department shall seek a federal waiver of Section 273.1(b)(7)(vi) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to allow for preenrollment of applicants prior to their release from the state prison or a county jail.

(d) By January 1, 2026, the department shall seek a federal waiver of Section 272.13 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to allow for delay of verification of incarcerated
 individuals for up to five months.

(e) The department shall seek any other relevant federal waivers necessary to implement this section.

(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department shall partner with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and county jails to allow for preenrollment of otherwise eligible applicants who are ineligible because of their incarceration status for the CalFresh program to ensure that an applicant’s benefits may begin as soon as possible upon reentry of the applicant into the community from the state prison or a county jail.

(2) In the case of a given county, the department shall implement the partnership described in paragraph (1) with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and county jails upon notification to the State Department of Health
 Care Services that the corresponding county has implemented the Justice-Involved Initiative that is developed by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to CalAIM provisions, including, but not limited to, Section 14184.800.

(g) This section shall become operative on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 9.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.4.

(a) Effective July 1, 2010, the department shall propose a Transitional Food Stamps for Foster Youth demonstration project under which independent foster care adolescents, as defined in Section 1905(w)(1) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(w)(1)) who are not eligible for CalWORKs or Supplemental Security Income program benefits, shall be eligible without regard to income or resources, subject to federal law authorizing demonstration projects pursuant to Section 2011 and following of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(b) An individual eligible for the program proposed pursuant to this section shall receive the maximum benefit amount allotted for a household size of one for the initial certification
 period, which shall remain constant for the entirety of the initial certification period. The food stamp case shall be established and maintained in the county of jurisdiction designated by the terminating foster care case.

(c) The demonstration project proposed pursuant to this section shall maximize access to benefits and minimize interim reporting requirements during the certification period.

(d) Not later than March 1, 2010, the department shall seek all necessary federal approvals to implement this section as a demonstration project for these beneficiaries. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(e) The department shall implement this section by an all-county letter (ACL) or similar instruction from the director and shall adopt regulations as
 otherwise necessary to implement this section no later than January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 501, Sec. 22.   (AB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.5.

(a) The department shall establish a program of categorical eligibility for CalFresh in accordance with Section 5(a) of the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2014(a)), and implementing regulations, to improve nutrition and promote the retention and development of assets and resources for needy households who meet all other federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program eligibility requirements. Categorical eligibility for CalFresh shall also apply to any individual who is a member of a household that will be receiving or is eligible to receive cash assistance under Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000), or eligible to receive food assistance under Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930).

(b) The director shall implement the program established pursuant to this section only with the appropriate federal authorization and if implementation would not result in the loss of federal financial participation.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 82) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 29, Sec. 83.   (SB 855)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by is own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.55.

(a) If a county has entered into a memorandum of understanding pursuant to Section 49557.3 of the Education Code, the county shall use the procedure described in this section to determine CalFresh program eligibility for children whose information is shared with the county pursuant to Section 49557.3 of the Education Code, and, if the child is eligible, the county to enroll the child in the CalFresh program, upon receipt of a signed CalFresh program application.

(b) Upon receipt of information on the School
 Lunch Program application pursuant to this section for a pupil who is not already enrolled in the CalFresh program, the county shall treat the application as an application for the CalFresh program. For purposes of administration of the CalFresh program, the application date shall be the date that the application is received by the county human services department. If the county determines that the pupil is already enrolled in the CalFresh program, it shall not take any further action. Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law or regulation, for purposes of expedited service processing, a county shall request information necessary for processing an application at the first point of contact following receipt of information. If information is provided to determine whether the household meets the criteria for expedited service, the expedited timeframe processing timeframes shall apply from the point of first contact. For the
 processing of other households, the processing timeframes shall apply from the point at which the county has received sufficient information in order to process the application.

(c) If the county determines from information on the School Lunch Program application and supporting documents that the child or his or her family meets the income eligibility requirements for participation in the CalFresh program, the county shall notify the parent or guardian of the child that the child or his or her family has been found eligible for the CalFresh program.

(d) If the county is unable to determine from the information on the application whether the child or his or her family is eligible for the CalFresh program, the county shall contact the parent or
 guardian of the child to seek any additional information regarding income, household composition, or deductions that the county may determine to be necessary to complete the CalFresh program application. If the county determines that the child or his or her family does not meet the eligibility requirements for participation in the CalFresh program, the county shall notify the parent or guardian of the child of the determination.

(e) Each county shall request the parent or guardian of each child whom the county determines meets the eligibility requirements for participation in the CalFresh program under subdivision (c) to provide additional documentation as required by current law necessary for retention of eligibility in the CalFresh program.

(f) If a parent or guardian of a child does not provide the documentation required for retention of CalFresh program eligibility, as
 requested pursuant to subdivision (e), the county shall deny or discontinue CalFresh program benefits in accordance with existing regulations and laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 504, Sec. 3.   (AB 402)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.56.

(a) The State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Social Services shall work together with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of school nutrition programs, representatives of local agencies that determine CalFresh program eligibility, family advocates, immigrant advocates, food policy advocates, representatives of the automated systems that support free and reduced-price school meals programs, Medi-Cal, the CalFresh program, and the electronic benefits transfer system, and representatives from the
 recognized exclusive employee organization representing county eligibility workers to develop a proposed statewide process for using data collected for purposes of those four programs, in addition to any necessary outreach or referrals to relevant county agencies, to increase enrollment in the CalFresh program. This process shall be targeted toward the families of pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price school meals in order to increase the enrollment of these families in the CalFresh program and to simplify and accelerate the CalFresh program enrollment process to the greatest extent possible.

(b) The State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Social Services, with input from the stakeholders described in subdivision (a), shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Collaboratively examine data from free and reduced-price school meals programs, Medi-Cal, the CalFresh program, and the electronic benefits transfer system to estimate the number of children whose families could potentially be eligible for enrollment in the CalFresh program.

(2) Research past efforts to increase enrollment of these families, including, but not limited to, efforts taken pursuant to Assembly Bill 402 (Chapter 504 of the Statutes of 2011). To the extent past efforts did not result in a significant increase in enrollment, the departments shall review the issues that precluded these efforts from being more effective and shall propose ways to address those issues.

(3) Discuss and determine
 possible ways to resolve issues that could arise in developing the proposed statewide process, including how to bridge different data systems, different definitions of key variables such as household composition and income, and different data verification processes that exist for each of the four programs.

(4) Examine different approaches, such as accelerated enrollment, a referral process, increased outreach, or other activities identified by the departments that could increase
 enrollment.

(5) Understand the differing data usage requirements, data sharing and confidentiality requirements, and other potential constraints governing the data used for each of the four programs and determine what federal authorization or state law changes, if any, would be needed to facilitate the processes identified by the departments.

(6) Identify any waivers from the federal government or changes to federal or state law that would be required to implement the processes the departments believe would be most effective for sharing data to increase enrollment in the CalFresh program.

(7) Determine how to implement, in the most streamlined way possible, any consent process required by state or federal
 law and how best to incorporate informed consent protocols into any recommended process for sharing data to increase enrollment in the CalFresh program.

(c) (1) On or before August 31, 2020, the State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Social Services shall submit recommendations pursuant to this section, and on any other issues they identify relating to increasing enrollment in the CalFresh program, to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature for consideration in a subsequent legislative session.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code,
 paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   (AB 1377)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.57.

The department, as the lead agency in partnership with the State Department of Education, shall maximize participation in the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 86.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.58.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with advocate representatives, county human service agencies, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop a methodology for estimating the CalFresh participation rate and identifying characteristics of Californians who are eligible for, but not receiving, CalFresh benefits.

(2) Identified characteristics may include, but are not limited to, race, ethnicity, preferred language, age, and location.

(3) The department shall identify any existing public assistance or public benefit data that may be used to identify Californians who are eligible for, but not receiving, CalFresh benefits.

(4) The department shall annually publish the CalFresh participation rate.

(b) The department shall utilize the data and metrics described in subdivision (a) to develop informed and targeted outreach strategies and to maximize federal funding for CalFresh outreach to reach Californians who are eligible for CalFresh benefits.

(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the department, in consultation with advocate representatives, county human service agencies, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop a strategic plan
 for how the department’s methodology and outreach strategies may be implemented and executed to maximize benefits to those eligible for CalFresh benefits.

(d) The department shall designate an executive-level employee of the department who shall report to the Director of Social Services on the implementation of the provisions of this section and Section 18901.59.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 33.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.59.

(a) The department may identify data-sharing opportunities with other state and local public entities, and any other unit of state government, for the purposes of improving the administration of CalFresh, increasing CalFresh participation, measuring the impact of
 CalFresh, and increasing access to critical public health and poverty-alleviating services and other services and benefits available to low-income individuals.

(b) The department shall designate an executive-level employee of the department who shall report to the Director of Social Services on the implementation of the provisions of this
 section and Section 18901.58.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (AB 593)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.6.

To the maximum extent allowable by federal law, each county welfare department shall provide transitional CalFresh benefits to households terminating their participation in the CalWORKs program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 73.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.7.

(a) To the extent allowable by federal law, the income, resources, and deductible expenses of any household member who is rendered ineligible for CalFresh benefits pursuant to Title IV of Public Law 104-193, and any amendments thereto, shall be excluded when calculating federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits administered in California as CalFresh, under this chapter.

(b) No household shall receive more CalFresh benefits under this section than it would have received if no household member was rendered ineligible pursuant to Title IV of Public Law 104-193 and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 74.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.8.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, and with receipt of necessary federal approvals, the State Department of Social Services, in conjunction with affected stakeholder groups, shall develop and implement, if otherwise feasible, a simplified and shorter application form for nonassistance CalFresh cases. The contents of this simpler form shall be evaluated for use in multiprogram application forms for the CalFresh, Medi-Cal, and CalWORKs programs. The department shall seek any federal approvals necessary for implementation of the form.

(b) The department shall not require any county to implement use of the form described in subdivision (a) until the county has been allowed sufficient time to reprogram its automated systems for the purpose of implementing the
 form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 121.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.9.

(a) For the purpose of eligibility under this chapter, the rules governing the resource value of motor vehicles shall be aligned with an alternative program allowed under federal food stamp law.

(b) The department shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement subdivision (a).

(c) If any federal approvals are necessary to implement subdivision (a), that subdivision shall be implemented only upon the execution of a declaration by the director, which shall be retained by the director, stating that any federal approvals necessary to implement subdivision (a) have been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.10.

To the extent permitted by federal law, and subject to the limitation in subdivision (d), each county welfare department shall, if appropriate, exempt a household from complying with face-to-face interview requirements for purposes of determining eligibility at initial application and recertification, according to the following:

(a) The county welfare department shall screen each household’s need for exemption status at application and recertification.

(b) A person eligible for an exemption under this section may request a face-to-face interview to establish initial eligibility or to comply with recertification requirements.

(c) (1) No later than
 January 1, 2022, for purposes of interview scheduling and rescheduling at initial application and recertification, county welfare departments shall implement one or more of the following interview scheduling techniques in addition to providing written notice, to the extent they are not currently in use: time-block, telephonic contact in conjunction with, or prior to, the provision of written communication about the need to schedule an interview, and same-day interviews.

(2) The department, in consultation with the counties and client advocates, may authorize additional scheduling techniques to fulfill the requirement described in paragraph (1).

(d) This section does not limit a county’s ability to require an applicant or recipient to make a personal appearance at a county welfare department office if the applicant or recipient no longer
 qualifies for an exemption or for other good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 82.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.11.

(a) For purposes of Section 273.5(b)(11)(ii) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, an educational program that could be a component of a CalFresh E&T program described in Section 18926.5, as identified by the department, shall be considered an employment and training program under Section 273.7 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, unless prohibited by federal law. 

(b) (1) The department shall maintain, regularly update, and post on its internet website the list of state- or locally-funded programs specified in Section 18901.12 and identified by the workgroup established pursuant to Chapter 729 of the Statutes of 2014
 that meet the standard set in Section 273.5(b)(11)(iv) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Upon an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, and to the extent permitted by federal law, the department
 shall include adult education and career technical education programs in the list of programs that are deemed to meet the standard set in Section 273.5(b)(11) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) (1) The department shall issue, maintain, and post on its internet website instructions for county human services agencies that maximize CalFresh eligibility and minimize the burden for applicants and recipients to verify exemptions to the CalFresh student eligibility rule for students. The instructions provided shall include specific guidance for processing applications, reporting, and recertification for all of the following:

 (A) Students who participate in at least one of the programs identified pursuant to subdivision (b) because they offer a program component
 that is equivalent to a CalFresh E&T program component.

(B) Students who are approved and anticipate participating in state or federal workstudy.

(C) Students who meet the qualification for an exemption set forth in Section 69519.3 of the Education Code, or are receiving tribal Temporary Aid to Needy Families (tribal TANF) or CalWORKs benefits.

(D) Students who are employed 20 hours a week or more on a reasonably anticipated monthly average, with instructions for allowing self-certification of employment and number of hours worked.

(E) Students with children, as described in Section 273.5(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(F) Students enrolled in a CalFresh E&T program.

(G) Students who do not intend to register during the next normal school term.

(H) Students enrolled in a Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) funded program, Job Opportunities and Basic Skills (JOBS) program under Title IV of the Social Security Act, or programs under Section 236 of the Trade Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. 2296) .

(I) Students who are physically or mentally unfit, pursuant to federal law.

(J) Student who are participating in a program of career and technical education, as defined in Section 3 of the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of 2006 (20 U.S.C. 2302) designed to be completed in not more than four years at an institution of higher education, as defined in Section 102 of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 1002).

(2) To the extent practicable, community colleges and universities shall distribute the standardized state or federal workstudy verification form to all students approved for state or federal workstudy.

(3) For
 purposes of this subdivision, and to the extent allowed by federal law, a student shall be considered to be “anticipating participation” in workstudy if the student can reasonably expect or foresee being assigned a workstudy job, and a student shall be deemed to be “anticipating participation” in workstudy until the student receives notice from the institution of higher education that the student has been denied participation in workstudy.

(d) (1) This section does not require a county human services agency to offer a particular component, support services, or workers’ compensation to a student found eligible for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(2) This section does not restrict or require the use of federal funds for the financing of CalFresh E&T
 programs.

(3) Except for the information required to complete the form specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), this section does not require a college or university to provide a student with information necessary to verify eligibility for CalFresh.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “student” means an individual who is enrolled at least half-time in an institution of higher education. A person shall be determined to be enrolled in an institution of higher education if the individual is enrolled, as an undergraduate or graduate student, in a business, technical, trade, or vocational school that normally requires a high school diploma or equivalency certificate for enrollment in the curriculum or if the individual is enrolled in a regular curriculum at a college or
 university that offers degree programs regardless of whether a high school diploma is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 874, Sec. 3.   (SB 641)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.12.

(a) On or before May 31, 2022, the department shall issue a guidance letter to counties, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, the Chancellor’s office of the California State University, and the Office of the President of the University of California that does all of the following:

(1) Clarifies the state and federal eligibility requirements for a campus-based program to be a state-approved local educational program that increases employability that qualifies for the student exemption for CalFresh eligibility, as described in Section 273.5(b)(11)(iv) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and is consistent with Section 273.7(e)(1) of Title 7 of the Code
 of Federal Regulations.

(2) Clarifies the application and approval process for a campus-based program to be approved by the department as a state-approved local educational program that increases employability, as described in paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, clarifying the supporting documents required for program approval.

(b) (1) A campus-based program at a campus of the California Community Colleges or at a campus of the California State University that meets the eligibility requirements to be a state-approved local educational program that increases employability, as established by the department’s guidance letter issued pursuant to subdivision (a), shall submit a certification application for the program to the department on or
 before September 1, 2022. If the campus-based program is available at more than one campus, the application shall list each campus at which the program is available. An individual campus
 administration, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, or the Chancellor’s office of the California State University, as applicable, may submit the certification application on behalf of the campus-based program.

(2) A campus-based program at a campus of the University of California that meets the eligibility requirements to be a state-approved local educational program that increases employability, as established by the department’s guidance letter issued pursuant to subdivision (a), is requested to submit a certification application for the program to the department on or before September 1, 2022. If the campus-based program is available at more than one campus, the application shall list each campus at which the program is available. An individual campus administration or the Office of the President
 of the University of California may submit the certification application on behalf of the campus-based program.

(c) (1) A campus-based program that meets the eligibility requirements to be a state-approved local educational program that increases employability after September 1, 2022, at a campus of the California Community Colleges or the California State University shall submit a certification application to the department on or before six months following the formation of the program. If the campus-based program is available at more than one campus, the application shall list each campus at which the program is available. An individual campus administration, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, or the Chancellor’s office of the California State University, as applicable, may submit the
 certification application on behalf of the campus-based program.

(2) A campus-based program that meets the eligibility requirements to be a state-approved local educational program that increases employability after September 1, 2022, at a campus of the University of California is requested to submit a certification application to the department on or before six months following the formation of the program. If the campus-based program is available at more than one campus, the application shall list each campus at which the program is available. An individual campus administration or the Office of the President of the University of California may submit the certification application on behalf of the campus-based program.

(d) Upon receipt of a certification application from a campus-based
 program pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), the department shall approve the campus-based program if it meets the eligibility requirements to be a state-approved local educational program that increases employability, as established in the department’s guidance letter issued pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) (1) On or before September 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, until 2030, the department shall report to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Assembly Committee on Human Services, the Senate Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Human Services all of the following information:

(A) The number of state-approved campus-based local educational programs that increase employability that are approved pursuant to subdivision (d), disaggregated by
 name and campus.

(B) The number of pending applications, disaggregated by name and campus.

(C) The number of applications denied, disaggregated by name and campus, and the reason for the denials.

(2) The department shall also post the report described in paragraph (1) on its internet website.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions that shall have the same force and effect as
 regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 164.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.14.

(a) The department shall convene a workgroup comprised of the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, the Student Aid Commission, representatives from student organizations from all three sectors of public postsecondary educational institutions, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and representatives from CalFresh eligibility workers and CalFresh advocates to identify the steps necessary to establish a CalFresh application submission process that accommodates the large influx of CalFresh applications during the beginning of a school term in counties where large public postsecondary educational institutions with 10,000 students or more are located. The workgroup may be convened as part of an existing workgroup that is comprised of the same members specified in this subdivision.

(b) On or before April 1, 2023, the department shall submit a report to the
 Legislature on the necessary steps identified pursuant to subdivision (a) and any estimates of costs associated with implementing them. The report shall include an analysis of using regional partnerships between counties and shall only include recommendations that are compliant with Section 10503 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The report required by this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 874, Sec. 4.   (SB 641)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18902.

Each county welfare department shall carry out the local administrative responsibilities of this chapter, subject to the supervision of the department and to rules and regulations adopted by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

18902.5.

(a) In the administration of this chapter counties may conduct an early fraud prevention and detection program pursuant to this section. 

(b) Funding for an early fraud prevention and detection program pursuant to Section 18906. 7 shall not be made to a county if the department determines that an early fraud prevention and detection program would not be cost-effective in that county. 

(c) Funding for an early fraud prevention and detection program pursuant to Section 18906.6 shall not be available to a county until its operating plan for a program is approved by the department. No operating plan shall be approved by the department unless the plan contains assurances that the county will comply with the conditions specified in subdivision (d). 

(d) Each county which operates an early fraud prevention and detection program shall be subject to all of the following conditions: 

(1) No intimidation of applicants or recipients shall occur, either by referral or threat of referral for a fraud investigation.

(2) Applicants shall not be referred for a fraud investigation until after they have completed and signed the application for aid. 

(3) The referral and investigation shall not delay the receipt of aid, including immediate need payments, for eligible applicants and recipients. 

(4) Uniformed investigators shall not be used by any county welfare department for its fraud prevention program. 

(5) The county welfare department shall abide by the confidentiality requirements in Section 10850 and the requirements and protections in the California Right to Financial Privacy Act under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(6) The county shall make a referral for welfare fraud investigation when there is reason to believe that fraud exists. Fraud exists when a person, on behalf of himself or herself or others, has done any of the following: 

(A) Knowingly, and with intent to deceive or defraud, made a false statement or representation to obtain benefits, to obtain a continuance or increase of benefits, or to avoid a reduction of benefits. 

(B) Knowingly, and with intent to defraud, failed to disclose a fact which, if disclosed, could result in a denial, reduction, or discontinuance of benefits. 

(C) Accepted benefits knowing he or she was not entitled to those benefits, or accepted any amount of benefits knowing the amount of benefits received was greater than the amount to which he or she was entitled. 

(D) Made any statement which he or she did not know to be true with reckless disregard of the truth, for the purpose of obtaining, continuing, or avoiding a reduction or denial of benefits. 

(7) The county shall make a referral for fraud investigation when there are reasonable grounds to believe that fraud, as specified in paragraph (6) exists. Reasonable grounds exist when one or more of the following criteria exists: 

(A) An overpayment or overissuance of benefits, or both, may result from an applicant’s failure to report information pertinent to eligibility or benefits. 

(B) A questionable situation exists and the applicant or third party acting on behalf of the applicant will not cooperate in providing necessary verification of information which would affect the applicant’s eligibility or the amount of benefits for which the applicant is eligible.

(C) The county welfare program staff person finds conflicting information which could affect the applicant’s eligibility or the amount of benefits for which the applicant is eligible, and any further action on the part of that staff person could jeopardize the investigator’s ability to investigate. 

(D) The county is made aware of any situation involving the applicant that could involve embezzlement, collusion, conspiracy, trafficking, black marketing, or any other general program violations. 

(E) The county is made aware of any situation in which the applicant may have forged, may have caused the forgery of, or is using a forgery of, any warrant or authorization to participate which has been negotiated. 

(F) The county welfare program staff person has received an allegation of fraud with respect to the applicant from any governmental agency. 

(G) The county has received a complaint containing facts which allege that a crime involving a public social services program, including, but not limited to, fraud, perjury, trafficking, or embezzlement may occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 22.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

18903.

The department shall enter into and execute on behalf of the state all necessary agreements in connection with this chapter as may be required by the United States Government.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.
